Maryland, session 2025, SB0197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
8–204.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services;
(2) the Secretary of Juvenile Services;
(3) a representative of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services, designated by the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services;
(4) a representative of the Department of Juvenile Services, designated by
the Secretary of Juvenile Services;
(5) a Deputy Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services;
(6) the president of the Maryland Correctional Administrators Association;
(7) the president of the Maryland Sheriffs Association;
(8) the president of the Maryland Criminal Justice Association;
– 1 –

Ch. 88 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(9) the Attorney General of the State;
(10) the president of a university or college in the State with a correctional
education curriculum, appointed by the Maryland Higher Education Commission;
(11) one correctional officer of the State recommended by the exclusive
representative for the officers covered under Title 10, Subtitle 9 of this article and
appointed by the Governor; [and]
(12) five correctional officers or officials appointed under subsection (c) of
this section; AND
(13) THE DIRECTOR OF THE DIVISION OF PAROLE AND PROBATION
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.;
AND
(14) ONE EMPLOYEE OF THE DIVISION OF PAROLE AND PROBATION
RECOMMENDED BY THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE FOR THE EMPLOYEES OF THE
DIVISION OF PAROLE AND PROBATION AND APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(d) Except for the five members appointed by the Governor under subsection (c)
of this section AND THE MEMBER APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(14) OF THIS
SECTION, a member of the Commission may serve personally at a Commission meeting or
designate a representative from the member’s unit or association who may act at any
meeting to the same effect as if the member were personally present.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –